Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5269.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The center for health information and analysis shall conduct an analysis of the effects of
eliminating or capping co-pays for mental and behavioral health services, including but not
limited to, the effects of such on:
(a) premiums and deductibles;
(b) access to mental and behavioral health service;
(c) mental and behavioral health service utilization;
(d) mental and behavioral health outcomes;
(e) socio-economic outcomes, including but not limited to:
(1) academic outcomes;
of 2

(2) economic outcomes, such as employment, income, and housing outcomes;
(3) disciplinary outcomes such as school-based discipline or criminal justice system-
based discipline
of 2